District of Columbia statutes.
10-551.08

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter, including rules for the valuation of the factors to be considered under § 50-551.06.

History

Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 1029, 58 DCR 6226

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1009 of Fiscal Year 2012 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-93, June 29, 2011, 58 DCR 5599).

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of Rulemaking Authority to the Department of General Services, see Mayor’s Order 2011-168, October 5, 2011 ( 58 DCR 8842).